Vermont, session 2025-2026, H96.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9434 is amended to read:
§ 9434. CERTIFICATE OF NEED; GENERAL RULES
(a) A health care facility other than a hospital shall not develop or have
developed on its behalf a new health care project without issuance of a
certificate of need by the Board. For purposes of this subsection, a “new
health care project” includes means any of the following:
(1) The construction, development, purchase, renovation, or other
establishment of a health care facility, or any capital expenditure by or on
behalf of a health care facility, for which the capital cost exceeds
$1,500,000.00 $10,000,000.00.
(2) A change from one licensing period to the next in the number of
licensed beds of a health care facility through addition or conversion, or
through relocation from one physical facility or site to another.
(3) The offering of any home health service, or the transfer or
conveyance of more than a 50 percent ownership interest in a health care
facility other than a hospital or nursing home.
(4) The purchase, lease, or other comparable arrangement of a single
piece of diagnostic and therapeutic equipment for which the cost, or in the case
of a donation the value, is in excess of $1,000,000.00 $5,000,000.00. For
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 2 of 7
2025
purposes of this subdivision, the purchase or lease of one or more articles of
diagnostic or therapeutic equipment that are necessarily interdependent in the
performance of their ordinary functions or that would constitute any health
care facility included under subdivision 9432(8)(B) of this title, as determined
by the Board, shall be considered together in calculating the amount of an
expenditure. The Board’s determination of functional interdependence of
items of equipment under this subdivision shall have the effect of a final
decision and is subject to appeal under section 9381 of this title.
(5) The offering of a health care service or technology having an annual
operating expense that exceeds $500,000.00 $3,000,000.00 for either of the
next two budgeted fiscal years, if the service or technology was not offered or
employed, either on a fixed or a mobile basis, by the health care facility within
the previous three fiscal years.
(6) The construction, development, purchase, lease, or other
establishment of an ambulatory surgical center. [Repealed.]
(b) A hospital shall not develop or have developed on its behalf a new
health care project without issuance of a certificate of need by the Board. For
purposes of this subsection, a “new health care project” includes the following:
(1) The construction, development, purchase, renovation, or other
establishment of a health care facility, or any capital expenditure by or on
behalf of a hospital, for which the capital cost exceeds $3,000,000.00.
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 3 of 7
2025
(2) The purchase, lease, or other comparable arrangement of a single
piece of diagnostic and therapeutic equipment for which the cost, or in the case
of a donation the value, is in excess of $1,500,000.00. For purposes of this
subdivision, the purchase or lease of one or more articles of diagnostic or
therapeutic equipment that are necessarily interdependent in the performance
of their ordinary functions or that would constitute any health care facility
included under subdivision 9432(8)(B) of this title, as determined by the
Board, shall be considered together in calculating the amount of an
expenditure. The Board’s determination of functional interdependence of
items of equipment under this subdivision shall have the effect of a final
decision and is subject to appeal under section 9381 of this title.
(3) The offering of a health care service or technology having an annual
operating expense that exceeds $1,000,000.00 for either of the next two
budgeted fiscal years, if the service or technology was not offered or
employed, either on a fixed or a mobile basis, by the hospital within the
previous three fiscal years.
(4) A change from one licensing period to the next in the number of
licensed beds of a health care facility through addition or conversion, or
through relocation from one physical facility or site to another.
(5) The offering of any home health service. [Repealed.]
(c) In the case of a project that requires a certificate of need under this
section, expenditures for which are anticipated to be in excess of
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 4 of 7
2025
$30,000,000.00 $50,000,000.00, the applicant first shall secure a conceptual
development phase certificate of need, in accordance with the standards and
procedures established in this subchapter, that permits the applicant to make
expenditures for architectural services, engineering design services, or any
other planning services, as defined by the Board, needed in connection with the
project. Upon completion of the conceptual development phase of the project,
and before offering or further developing the project, the applicant shall secure
a final certificate of need in accordance with the standards and procedures
established in this subchapter. Applicants shall not be subject to sanctions for
failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection if such failure is solely
the result of good faith reliance on verified project cost estimates issued by
qualified persons, which cost estimates would have led a reasonable person to
conclude the project was not anticipated to be in excess of $30,000,000.00
$50,000,000.00 and therefore not subject to this subsection. The provisions of
this subsection notwithstanding, expenditures may be made in preparation for
obtaining a conceptual development phase certificate of need, which
expenditures shall not exceed $1,500,000.00 for non-hospitals or
$3,000,000.00 for hospitals $10,000,000.00.
(d) If the Board determines that a person required to obtain a certificate of
need under this subchapter has separated a single project into components in
order to avoid cost thresholds or other requirements under this subchapter, the
person shall be required to submit an application for a certificate of need for
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 5 of 7
2025
the entire project, and the Board may proceed under section 9445 of this title.
The Board’s determination under this subsection shall have the effect of a final
decision and is subject to appeal under section 9381 of this title.
(e) The Board may periodically adjust the monetary jurisdictional
thresholds contained in this section. In doing so, the Board shall reflect the
same categories of health care facilities, services, and programs recognized in
this section. Any adjustment by the Board shall not exceed an amount
calculated using the cumulative Consumer Price Index rate of inflation.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9435 is amended to read:
§ 9435. EXCLUSIONS
* * *
(f)(1) Excluded from this subchapter are routine replacements of:
(A) medical equipment that is fully depreciated; and
(B) nonmedical equipment and fixtures, including furnaces, boilers,
refrigeration units, kitchen equipment, heating and cooling units, and similar
items, regardless of their remaining useful life.
(2) These The replacements described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and purchased by a hospital shall be included in the hospital’s
budget and may be reviewed in the budget process set forth in subchapter 7 of
this chapter.
* * *
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 6 of 7
2025
(i) Excluded from this subchapter are emergency and nonemergency
ground ambulance services, affiliated agencies, and equipment and supplies
used by emergency medical personnel, as those terms are defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 2651.
(j) Excluded from this subchapter are the offering of a health care service,
or the construction, development, purchase, renovation, or other establishment
of a health care facility, that is owned or operated by the State of Vermont or is
funded in whole or in substantial part by a contract or grant awarded by the
State of Vermont; provided, however, that the State agency sponsoring the
project or awarding the contract or grant shall inform the Green Mountain Care
Board prior to commencing the project or within 30 days following the
execution of the contract or grant.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage and shall apply to all new health care
projects initiated on or after that date. For applications for a certificate of need
that are already in process on the date of passage of this act for which one or
more persons have been granted interested party status, the jurisdictional
thresholds and exclusions in place at the time the application was filed shall
continue to apply until a final decision is made on the application. For
applications for a certificate of need that are already in process on the date of
passage of this act for which no person has been granted interested party status,
the applicant may withdraw the application in accordance with Board rules.
VT LEG #383686 v.1

No. 15 Page 7 of 7
2025
Date Governor signed bill: May 13, 2025
VT LEG #383686 v.1